Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 1, section 61, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Evaluation and report. By December 1, 2024, the commissioner must submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services finance and policy an interim report on the impact and outcomes of the grants, including the number of grants awarded and the organizations receiving the grants. The interim report must include any available evidence of how grantees were able to increase utilization of supported decision making and reduce or avoid more restrictive forms of decision making such as guardianship and conservatorship. By December 1, 2025, the commissioner must submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services finance and policy a deleted text begin finaldeleted text end new text begin second interimnew text end report on the impact and outcomes of the grants, including any updated information from the interim report and the total number of people served by the grants. The deleted text begin finaldeleted text end new text begin second interimnew text end report must also detail how the money was used to achieve the requirements in subdivision 3, paragraph (b).new text begin By December 1, 2027, the commissioner must submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services finance and policy a final report on the impact and outcomes of the grants, including any updated information from the interim reports and the total number of people served by the grants.new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SUPPORTED DECISION MAKING PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for supported decision grants under Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 1, section 61. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end